Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.070

Qualifications of applicants.

This section establishes the minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional landscape architect.

(1) A certificate of licensure shall be granted by the director to all qualified applicants who are certified by the board as having passed the required examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion of the required education and work experience.

(2) An applicant for licensure as a landscape architect shall be of a good moral character, at least eighteen years of age, and shall possess one of the following qualifications:

(a) Have a professional landscape architectural degree from an institution of higher education accredited by the national landscape architecture accreditation board, or an equivalent degree in landscape architecture as determined by the board, and three years of practical landscape architectural work experience under the supervision of a registered or licensed landscape architect; or

(b) Have a high school diploma or equivalent and eight years' practical landscape architectural work experience, which may include landscape design as a principal activity and postsecondary education approved by the board. At least six years of work experience must be under the direct supervision of a registered or licensed landscape architect. An applicant may receive up to two years of practical landscape architectural work experience for postsecondary education courses in landscape architecture, landscape architectural technology, or a related field, including courses in a community or technical college, if the courses are equivalent to education courses in an accredited landscape architectural degree program.

[ 2009 c 370 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.